norsk/patterns/norsk.single.pat
y1ko
y1la
yli8e7ne
yl8j
ylst7r
y7lus.
y5ly
ym7j
ym3p2
ym6sl
ynderle8
yndes8
yn8deste
ynfa8
yng7r
yn6g7ø
y7ni
yni8v
yn2sk
yns8ka.
yor2
york3
you4
y1pi
y1po
yp3r
y1ra
y7raran
y7retø
y1ro3
yr2st
yrs3te
y3r6u
y1rå1
8ys
y6sak
ys7a8ker.
y8seb
ysi8e
ys7kare
ys5ke
y2s3l
ys3os
ys5p
ys3ta
y6ster
yst3r
y7stu8
ys5væ
ys7w
y1ta
yter5s4
yt3j
y1to
yt3re
yt3ri
y7tå6
y7u8g
y1v
y6vj
y7w
y1z
zag7
zani6
zania9
8zb
zel7s
6zf
1zi
z1l
zof4
zo3is
4z5s
z1t
1zu
z3v
z1z
z4zia
z4zl
æ4bø
æ1d
æ1f
æ1g
æ3ki
æ8kj
æk6l
æ1l
æ1ra
æ6r7aa
æ4rari
æ2reg
ære4ge
ærie7
æri6ene
ær7o6
æ7ru
ær1ø
æ2sj
æs5k
æ1st
æ7ta
æt8tas
æ5va6
ævar7
æ3vi
ø3a
øa6n
øb3l
øbo6
ø5br
øds6t
ø1e2
ø6eg
ø6e7re
ø7est
øf3
øf8la.
øf8le.
øf8r
øf6tu
ø4g5i
øg3l
øg7sti
ø3he
øi8e
ø1in
ø1ka
ø1ki
ø1kj
ø6kjar
øk3l
ø7kr
ø8krar
ø1la
ølst8
ø7ly
øm2sl
øn8nø
ønst3
øns3te
ø1pi
øp2sl
ø1ra
ø2ra.
ø2reb
ø6red
ø8r7ei
ø8rej
ø4rek
ø2rem
ø8r7eng
ø4reta
ørk6l
ør6k5r
ør6k7v
ør8mu
ør6n7u
ør2s3m
ør2st
ørs3te
ø5run
ø7røy
ør7øy.
ø4s3ak
ø8sarar
øs1h
ø7s8m
øs7tan
øst7a8s
øs7ters
øst3r
ø6s5ø6
ø1ta
ø1va
ø8v7aa
ø1ve
ø1vi
øv3r
øy5al
øy3an
øy4ra.
øy3tr
ø7å6
å1a
åa4n
å5aran
åbe3
å1d
å1e
åe2n
å3er
å7est
å1f
åg5rin
å1h
å1i
å7j
å1ka
å1ki
å5ko
å3kø
å1l
ål3øy
å1m
å8mo
åm7os
åne7s8
å7o
å3pi
åp6ta
år3ak
å3ran
å5rar.
år7un
å1s
ås7eid
å6sf
ås3h
å8si.
å2sn
å2ste
ås6ti
ås7v
å3tan
8åti
åt4s3l
åt8ti.
åt8tia
åt6tie
åt2t3r
åt4t5æ
å1v
